Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB236.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 1630YC (1) 91 jm/jh H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 423.2, subsection 4, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 4. a. A tax of six percent is imposed upon the sales price , 3 less prizes actually paid, derived from the operation of all 4 forms of amusement devices and upon the sales price derived 5 from the operation of all games of skill, games of chance, 6 raffles, and bingo games as defined in chapter 99B , and card 7 game tournaments conducted under section 99B.27 , that are 8 operated or conducted within the state, the tax to be collected 9 from the operator in the same manner as for the collection of 10 taxes upon the sales price of tickets or admission as provided 11 in this section . Nothing in this subsection shall legalize any 12 games of skill or chance or slot-operated devices which are now 13 prohibited by law. 14 b. The Except as provided in paragraph âaâ , the tax 15 imposed under this subsection covers the total amount from the 16 operation of games of skill, games of chance, raffles, and 17 bingo games as defined in chapter 99B , card game tournaments 18 conducted under section 99B.27 , and musical devices, weighing 19 machines, shooting galleries, billiard and pool tables, 20 bowling alleys, pinball machines, slot-operated devices 21 selling merchandise not subject to the general sales taxes 22 and on the total amount from devices or systems where prizes 23 are in any manner awarded to patrons and upon the receipts 24 from fees charged for participation in any game or other 25 form of amusement, and generally upon the sales price from 26 any source of amusement operated for profit, not specified 27 in this section , and upon the sales price from which tax is 28 not collected for tickets or admission, but tax shall not be 29 imposed upon any activity exempt from sales tax under section 30 423.3, subsection 78 . Every person receiving any sales price 31 from the sources described in this section is subject to all 32 provisions of this subchapter relating to retail sales tax and 33 other provisions of this chapter as applicable. 34 EXPLANATION 35 -1- LSB 1630YC (1) 91 jm/jh 1/ 2 H.F. _____ The inclusion of this explanation does not constitute agreement with 1 the explanationâs substance by the members of the general assembly. 2 This bill provides a sales tax exemption on the sales price 3 from the operation of amusement devices, to the extent the 4 amount of the sales price represents amounts that will be 5 awarded as prizes during the operation of such devices. 6 -2- LSB 1630YC (1) 91 jm/jh 2/ 2